Mississippi, session 2026, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following shall be codified as Section 37-142-1, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-142-1.  (1)  The Legislature finds and declares that Mississippi's state special schools, including the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS), the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) and the Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and the Blind (MSDB) provide specialized, mission-driven educational opportunities to unique student populations across the state. These institutions serve a compelling public purpose and must remain free from any institutional, administrative, fiscal or operational encroachment that may diminish their autonomy or mission. (2)  The Legislature further finds that cooperative partnerships between state special schools and the state's public universities may provide educational enrichment, resource sharing, research opportunities and expanded student pathways, and that such partnerships should be encouraged where mutually beneficial. However, such collaboration must occur under a statutory framework that ensures the continued independence, governance and operational authority of each state special school. (3)  The Legislature additionally finds that public universities may, where appropriate, contribute expertise toward the development of future state special schools serving Grades 6 through 12.  However, it is imperative that any such special school must remain under the control of the Mississippi Department of Education and governed by the State Board of Education, and must operate with full fiscal and administrative independence from any university or the Institutions of Higher Learning. SECTION 2.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-142-3, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-142-3.  (1)  For purposes of this act: (a)  The term "state special school" means the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS), the Mississippi School for the Arts (MSA) and the Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and the Blind (MSDB), and any other special school established by statute for the purpose of providing specialized education services. (b)  The term "university partner" means any public institution of higher learning governed by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (2)  The State Board of Education, acting through the administration of any state special school, is authorized to enter into memoranda of understanding, cooperative agreements or contractual arrangements with a university partner for academic enrichment programming, instructional services, shared use of instructional or research facilities, joint research or professional development initiatives, dual enrollment or early-college programs or other activities that advance student learning and institutional missions.  Any such agreement shall require approval of the State Board of Education before execution and shall be entered solely for the benefit of the participating state special school and its students. (3)  A state special school may elect, but shall not be required, to contract with a university partner for noninstructional shared services such as information technology support, safety and security services, maintenance, custodial services, transportation support, food service or other operational functions.  Any such service shall be provided only under a written agreement voluntarily entered by the state special school, subject to annual renewal or termination at the option of the school, and no state special school shall be compelled to accept or continue such services. (4)  No partnership agreement or cooperative arrangement authorized under this section shall confer, upon a university partner or the Board of Trustee of State Institutions of Higher Learning, any administrative authority, supervisory authority, policy-setting authority, personnel authority, budgetary authority or decision-making authority over a state special school. Governance of state special schools shall remain exclusively vested in the State Board of Education unless otherwise modified by explicit act of the Legislature. (5)  All agreements executed pursuant to this section shall be publicly posted on the websites of the participating state special school and the partnering university, and copies shall be submitted to the Senate and House Education Committees within thirty (30) days of execution.  Each agreement shall contain a sunset, termination or mandatory review clause that shall not exceed five (5) years from the effective date of the agreement. (6)  A public university may submit, to the State Department of Education, a formal proposal for the creation of a new state special school serving Grades 6 through 12, provided that the proposed school addresses a defined student population or academic specialty area not served by an existing state special school. The proposal shall require approval by the State Board of Education and shall not become effective unless authorized by subsequent act of the Legislature or specific line-item appropriation. (7)  (a)  Any state special school established pursuant to subsection (6) shall: (i)  Operate under the exclusive governance of the State Board of Education; (ii)  Serve as its own fiscal agent; (iii)  Manage its own budget, staffing, contracts, and operations; and (iv)  Not be supervised, managed, regulated or operated by any university partners or the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (b)  University-partner involvement, if any, shall be limited to advisory roles or contractual partnerships expressly permitted under this section. (c)  Every state special school shall retain and exercise full authority to: (i)  Function as its own fiscal agent; (ii)  Receive, manage and expend state, federal and private funds; (iii) Independently negotiate, award and administer contracts; (iv)  Hire, assign, supervise and dismiss personnel; and (v)  Establish, implement and evaluate curriculum, admissions processes, instructional methods, student supports and school operations. (8)  No agreement entered into under this section shall diminish or transfer these authorities.  Any university involvement is limited to advisory partnerships or contractual services.  Any agreement entered into under this section shall ensure that: (a)  Where a state special school operates on or occupies facilities located on the campus of a partnering university, the university partner shall remain responsible for the maintenance, repair and replacement of major building systems, capital improvements, and life-safety infrastructure, including but not limited to structural integrity, HVAC and mechanical systems, fire safety systems, and grounds upkeep associated with the facilities provided for the use of the state special school, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by both parties; (b)  Where a state special school operates on or occupies facilities on a university campus, the university partner shall maintain the physical spaces allocated for use by the state special school to reasonable and functional standards and shall provide utility services necessary for operation.  In facilities that lack dedicated utility meters, the university partner shall apply a reasonable prorated utility allocation methodology mutually agreed upon by both parties; (c)  A state special school retains the authority to independently contract for food services, custodial and grounds services, safety and security services, and other operational services, notwithstanding any service contracts maintained by a partnering university or entity; (d)  Facilities and spaces primarily used by a state special school located on a university campus shall be maintained by the university partner in a condition consistent with standards applied to comparable instructional facilities on that campus, including reasonable standards of cleanliness, safety, environmental quality and functionality.  Partnerships may include provisions for aesthetic or facility upgrades, improvements or enhancements to ensure suitable student and staff learning environments; (e)  Students of a state special school may enroll in courses offered by a partnering university when approved by the state special school's administration.  Tuition, fee waivers, cost-sharing, and materials access shall be determined by written agreement; (f)  Following transition to independent fiscal agency, any state special school shall retain full access to personnel, financial, and operational records necessary for continuity of operations.  Partner institutions shall retain archival records according to state records-retention laws and ensure secure electronic access during transition; and (g)  Services historically provided to a state special school shall not be materially diminished without mutual written agreement and sufficient transition time for the school to secure alternative services. SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-142-5, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-142-5.  (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each state special school, including the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS), the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) and the Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and the Blind (MSDB), shall be additionally funded to their yearly appropriation through the Mississippi Student Funding Formula (MSFF) beginning in Fiscal Year 2027.  For purposes of total funding formula implementation, state special schools shall be treated as independent public schools operated under the exclusive governance of the State Board of Education. (2)  Each state special school shall generate total funding formula funding based on its applicable student enrollment, programmatic weights and categorical allocations as determined by the State Board of Education, and shall not be subject to any local contribution requirement or ad valorem tax assumption. (3)  Total funding formula funds generated by a state special school shall be allocated directly to the school as its own fiscal agent and shall not flow through any school district, public university or the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (4)  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the Legislature's authority to provide additional direct appropriations, categorical funding or capital support to state special schools outside of the Mississippi Student Funding Formula. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.